Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB250.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Immediate family member" means a spouse, parent, sibling, child, mother-
in-law, father-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, grandparent, or
grandchild; and
(b) "Law enforcement officer" means a:
1. Person who is employed as a sworn law enforcement officer by a city,
county, urban-county government, or charter county government law
enforcement agency;
2. Sheriff or full-time deputy sheriff; or
3. Constable granted police powers.
(2) A property owner or his or her authorized agent may request a law enforcement
officer to immediately remove a person or persons unlawfully occupying a
residential dwelling or other structure on the real property pursuant to this
section if:
(a) The real property being occupied includes a residential dwelling;
(b) An unauthorized person or persons have unlawfully entered and remain or
continue to reside on the property owner's property;
(c) The real property was not open to members of the public at the time the
unauthorized person or persons entered;
(d) The property owner has directed the unauthorized person to leave the
property;
(e) The unauthorized person or persons are not current or holdover tenants
pursuant to a written or oral rental agreement authorized by the property
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/3/2025 3:41 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 44
owner;
(f) The unauthorized person or persons are not immediate family members of
the property owner; and
(g) There is no pending litigation related to the real property between the
property owner and any known unauthorized person.
(3) The request for immediate removal of an unlawful occupant of a residential
dwelling or other structure under subsection (2) of this section shall be made by
presenting a completed and notarized Petition to Remove Persons Unlawfully
Occupying Residential Real Property to the law enforcement officer. The
submitted petition shall be in substantially the following form:
"PETITION TO REMOVE PERSONS UNLAWFULLY OCCUPYING
RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY
I, the owner or authorized agent of the owner of the real property located at ...., declare
under penalty of perjury that (initial each box):
1. .... I am the owner of the real property or the authorized agent of the owner of the
real property.
2. .... I obtained title to the property on or about.....
3. .... The real property includes a residential dwelling.
4. .... An unauthorized person or persons have unlawfully entered and are
remaining or residing unlawfully on the real property.
5. .... The real property was not open to members of the public at the time the
unauthorized person or persons entered.
6. .... I have directed the unauthorized person or persons to leave the real property,
but they have not done so.
7. .... The person or persons are not current or holdover tenants pursuant to any
valid lease authorized by the property owner, and any lease that may be produced by an
occupant is fraudulent.
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/3/2025 3:41 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 44
8. .... The unauthorized person or persons sought to be removed are not an owner or
a co-owner of the property and have not been listed on the title to the property unless
the person or persons have engaged in title fraud.
9. .... The unauthorized person or persons are not immediate family members of the
property owner.
10. .... There is no litigation related to the real property pending between the property
owner and any person sought to be removed.
11. .... I understand that a person or persons removed from the property pursuant to
this procedure may bring a cause of action against me for any false statements made in
this petition, or for wrongfully using this procedure, and that as a result of such action
I may be held liable for actual damages, penalties, costs, and reasonable attorneys'
fees.
12. .... I am requesting the law enforcement officer to immediately remove the
unauthorized person or persons from the residential property.
13. .... A copy of my valid government-issued identification is attached, or I am an
agent of the property owner, and documents evidencing my authority to act on the
property owner's behalf are attached.
I HAVE READ EVERY STATEMENT MADE IN THIS PETITION AND EACH
STATEMENT IS TRUE AND CORRECT. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE
STATEMENTS MADE IN THIS PETITION ARE BEING MADE UNDER
PENALTY OF PERJURY, PUNISHABLE UNDER KRS 523.030."
.......... (signature of property owner or agent of owner)
(4) (a) Upon receipt of a petition in accordance with subsection (3) of this section,
the law enforcement officer shall verify that the person submitting the
petition is the record owner of the real property or the authorized agent of
the owner and appears otherwise entitled to relief under this section.
Verification may be accomplished by presenting a government-issued photo
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/3/2025 3:41 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 44
identification.
(b) If ownership is verified, the law enforcement officer shall, without
unnecessary delay, serve a notice to immediately vacate the property on all
the unlawful occupants and shall put the owner in possession of the real
property.
(c) The service required in paragraph (b) of this subsection may be
accomplished by hand delivery of the notice to an occupant or by posting
the notice on the front door or entrance of the dwelling or other structure.
(d) The law enforcement officer shall attempt to verify the identity of all
persons occupying the dwelling or other structure and note the identities on
the return of service. If appropriate, the law enforcement officer may arrest
any person found in the dwelling or other structure for trespass,
outstanding warrants, or any other legal cause.
(e) A law enforcement officer acting in good faith under this subsection shall
be immune from criminal and civil liability.
(5) (a) The sheriff or constable may charge a fee of twenty dollars ($20) for service
of the notice to immediately vacate the property.
(b) After the law enforcement officer serves the notice to immediately vacate the
property, the property owner or authorized agent may request that the law
enforcement officer remain at the premises to keep the peace while the
property owner or agent changes the locks and removes the personal
property of the unlawful occupants from the premises to or near the
property line.
(c) The property owner or his or her authorized agent acting in good faith shall
be immune from criminal and civil liability due to the loss of, destruction of,
or damage to the personal property of the unlawful occupants unless the
removal is found to be wrongful under subsection (6) of this section.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/3/2025 3:41 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 44
(6) (a) A person may bring a civil cause of action against a petitioner alleging
wrongful removal under this section. A person harmed by a wrongful
removal under this section may be restored to possession of the real
property and may recover actual costs and damages incurred, statutory
damages equal to triple the fair market rent of the dwelling, court costs, and
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(b) An action for wrongful removal under this section shall be filed in the
District Court of the county in which the property is located.
(c) The action for wrongful removal shall be commenced within sixty (60) days
after the wrongful removal.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 523 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of making a false statement to detain real property when he or
she knowingly and with intent to detain or remain upon real property presents to
another person a fraudulent document purporting to be a valid lease agreement,
deed, or other instrument conveying real property rights.
(2) Making a false statement to detain real property is a Class A misdemeanor.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/3/2025 3:41 PM Jacketed